Indiana, session 2026, SB231.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 10-17-16 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 16. Prohibition of Receiving Compensation for
Assisting a Person in Obtaining Veterans' Benefits
Sec. 1. This chapter does not apply to:
(1) a representative of a recognized organization;
(2) an agent; or
(3) an attorney;
accredited under 38 CFR 14.629 (as in effect July 1, 2025).
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "compensation" means the
payment of:
(1) money;
(2) a thing of value; or
(3) a financial benefit.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "person" means:
(1) an individual;
2026 IN 231—LS 6559/DI 116


(2) a corporation;
(3) a business trust;
(4) an estate;
(5) a trust;
(6) a partnership;
(7) a limited liability company;
(8) an association;
(9) a joint venture;
(10) a public corporation;
(11) a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or
instrumentality; or
(12) any other legal or commercial entity.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "veterans' benefits matter"
means the preparation, presentation, or prosecution of any claim
affecting any person who has filed, or expressed an intent to file, a
claim for any benefit, program, service, commodity, function,
status, or entitlement for which veterans, their dependents, their
survivors, or any other individuals are eligible under the laws and
regulations administered by the United States Department of
Veterans Affairs or the United States Department of Defense
pertaining to veterans, their dependents, their survivors, and any
other individual eligible for those benefits.
Sec. 5. A person may not do the following:
(1) Receive compensation for:
(A) the preparation, presentation, or prosecution of; or
(B) advising, consulting, or assisting an individual
regarding;
a veterans' benefits matter, except as permitted under federal
law.
(2) Receive compensation for referring an individual to
another person to:
(A) prepare;
(B) present, prosecute, or advise on; or
(C) consult or assist the individual regarding;
a veterans' benefits matter.
(3) Receive, with respect to an individual's veterans' benefits
matter, compensation for services rendered before the date on
which a notice of disagreement, decision review, or appeal is
filed, whichever occurs first.
(4) Guarantee, either directly or by implication, that any
individual is certain to receive specific veterans' benefits or
that any individual is certain to receive a specific level,
2026 IN 231—LS 6559/DI 116


percentage, or amount of veterans' benefits.
(5) Receive excessive or unreasonable fees as compensation
for the preparation, presentation, or prosecution of, or
advising, consulting, or assisting an individual regarding a
veterans' benefits matter. The factors articulated in 38 CFR
14.636 (as in effect January 1, 2025) govern the determination
of whether a fee is excessive or unreasonable.
(6) Condition repayment of fees:
(A) upon the opening of a joint account with the recipient
of veterans' benefits from which the person may make
withdrawals;
(B) upon the use of electronic funds transfers (as defined in
15 U.S.C. 1693a(7)); or
(C) by requiring an individual to act, in any manner, in
violation of 12 CFR 1005.10(c)(1), regardless of whether
the provision would otherwise be applicable to the
transaction.
(7) Collect, or attempt to collect, any fee for services rendered
after receipt of benefits by a veteran, the veteran's
dependents, the veteran's survivors, or any other individual
eligible for the benefits, if the person participated in the
veterans' benefits matter prior to the issuance of veterans'
benefits, and if the transaction was structured with an intent
to avoid any of the prohibitions of this chapter. There is a
rebuttable presumption that any collection, or attempted
collection, of the fees was in violation of this chapter.
Sec. 6. A person seeking to receive compensation for:
(1) the preparation, presentation, or prosecution of; or
(2) advising, consulting, or assisting an individual regarding;
a veterans' benefits matter shall, before rendering any services,
enter into a written agreement signed by both parties that adheres
to all criteria specified in 38 CFR 14.636 (as in effect July 1, 2025),
including all terms regarding the individual's payment of fees for
services rendered.
Sec. 7. (a) A person may not advise or assist for compensation
any individual concerning any veterans' benefits matter without
clearly providing, at the outset of the business relationship, the
following disclosure, both orally and in writing:
"This business is not sponsored by, or affiliated with, the
United States Department of Veterans Affairs or any other
federally chartered veterans' service organization. Other
organizations, including the Indiana Department of Veterans'
2026 IN 231—LS 6559/DI 116


Affairs, your local county veterans service officer, and other
federally chartered veterans' service organizations, may be
able to provide you with this service free of charge. Products
or services offered by this business are not necessarily
endorsed by any of these organizations. You may qualify for
other veterans' benefits beyond the benefits for which you are
receiving services here.".
The written disclosure shall appear in a least 12 point type and
shall appear in a readily noticeable and identifiable place in the
person's agreement with the individual seeking services. The
individual shall verbally acknowledge understanding of the oral
disclosure and shall sign the document in which the written
disclosure appears to represent understanding of these provisions.
The person offering services shall retain a copy of the written
disclosure while providing veterans' benefits services for
compensation to the individual and for at least one (1) year after
the date on which the services relationship terminates.
(b) A person may not advertise for compensation services in
veterans' benefits matters without including the following
disclosure:
"This business is not sponsored by, or affiliated with, the
United States Department of Veterans Affairs, the Indiana
Department of Veterans' Affairs, or any other federally
chartered veterans' service organization. Other organizations,
including the Indiana Department of Veterans' Affairs, your
local county veterans' service officer, and other federally
chartered veterans' service organizations, may be able to
provide you with these services free of charge. Products or
services offered by this business are not necessarily endorsed
by any of these organizations. You may qualify for other
veterans' benefits beyond the benefits that this business offers
through its services.".
If the advertisement is printed, including advertisements visible on
the Internet, the disclosure shall appear in a readily visible place
on the advertisement. If the advertisement is verbal, the statement
of the disclosure shall be clear and intelligible.
Sec. 8. A violation of this chapter constitutes a deceptive act
under IC 24-5-0.5.
Sec. 9. A violation of this chapter in connection with a senior
customer (as defined in IC 24-4.6-6-3(5)) constitutes a violation
under IC 24-4.6-6.
Sec. 10. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, or part of this
2026 IN 231—LS 6559/DI 116


chapter or the application thereof is determined by any court of
competent jurisdiction to be invalid, the judgment shall not affect,
impair, or invalidate the remainder of the chapter, but shall be
confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, or part
directly involved in the controversy in which the judgment shall be
been rendered.
SECTION 2. IC 24-4.6-6-5, AS ADDED BY P.L.250-2013,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) A senior consumer who is a victim of an act
described in section 4(a) or 4(b) of this chapter, or conduct in
violation of IC 10-17-16, may bring an action against the person who
commits the act.
(b) In an action brought against a person under this section, the
court may order the person to:
(1) return property or assets improperly obtained, controlled, or
used; and
(2) reimburse the senior consumer for any damages incurred or
for the value of the property or assets lost as a result of the
violation or violations of this chapter.
(c) In addition to the remedy provided in subsection (b), a court may
order the following:
(1) For knowing violations committed by a person who is not in
a position of trust and confidence:
(A) payment of two (2) times the amount of damages incurred
or value of property or assets lost; and
(B) payment of a civil penalty not exceeding five thousand
dollars ($5,000).
(2) For knowing violations committed by a person in a position of
trust and confidence:
(A) payment of treble damages; and
(B) payment of a civil penalty not exceeding ten thousand
dollars ($10,000).
(d) The court may award reasonable attorney's fees to a senior
consumer that prevails in an action under this section. Actual damages
awarded to a person under this section have priority over any civil
penalty imposed under this chapter.
(e) The burden of proof in proving that a person committed financial
exploitation of a senior consumer under section 4 of this chapter is by
a preponderance of the evidence.
(f) The attorney general may bring an action to enjoin an alleged
commission of financial exploitation of a senior consumer, including
conduct in violation of IC 10-17-16, and may petition the court to
2026 IN 231—LS 6559/DI 116


freeze the assets of the person allegedly committing financial
exploitation of a senior consumer in an amount equal to but not greater
than the alleged value of lost property or assets for purposes of
restoring to the victim the value of the lost property or assets. The
burden of proof required to freeze the assets of a person allegedly
committing financial exploitation of a senior consumer is by a
preponderance of the evidence. In addition, the court may:
(1) issue an injunction;
(2) order the person to make payment of the money unlawfully
received from the senior consumer or senior consumers, to be
held in escrow for distribution to the aggrieved senior consumer
or senior consumers;
(3) for knowing violations, increase the amount of restitution
ordered under subdivision (2) in any amount up to three (3) times
the amount of damages incurred or value of property or assets
lost;
(4) order the person to pay to the state the reasonable costs of the
attorney general's investigation and prosecution related to the
action;
(5) provide for the appointment of a receiver;
(6) for knowing violations by a person who is not in a position of
trust and confidence, order the person to pay a civil penalty of up
to five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation; and
(7) for knowing violations by a person in a position of trust and
confidence, order the person to pay a civil penalty of up to ten
thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation.
(g) In an action under subsection (a) or (f), the court may void or
limit the application of contracts or clauses resulting from the financial
exploitation.
(h) In an action under subsection (a), upon the filing of the
complaint or on the appearance of any defendant, claimant, or other
party, or at any later time, the trial court, the supreme court, or the court
of appeals may require the plaintiff, defendant, claimant, or other party
or parties to give security, or additional security, in a sum the court
directs to pay all costs, expenses, and disbursements that are awarded
against that party or that the party may be directed to pay by any
interlocutory order, by the final judgment, or on appeal.
(i) Any person who violates the terms of an injunction issued under
subsection (f) shall forfeit and pay to the state a civil penalty of not
more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per violation. For the
purposes of this section, the court issuing the injunction shall retain
jurisdiction, the cause shall be continued, and the attorney general
2026 IN 231—LS 6559/DI 116


acting in the name of the state may petition for recovery of civil
penalties. Whenever the court determines that an injunction issued
under subsection (f) has been violated, the court shall award reasonable
costs to the state.
SECTION 3. IC 24-5-0.5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.104-2024,
SECTION 42, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A supplier may not commit an unfair,
abusive, or deceptive act, omission, or practice in connection with a
consumer transaction. Such an act, omission, or practice by a supplier
is a violation of this chapter whether it occurs before, during, or after
the transaction. An act, omission, or practice prohibited by this section
includes both implicit and explicit misrepresentations.
(b) Without limiting the scope of subsection (a), the following acts,
and the following representations as to the subject matter of a
consumer transaction, made orally, in writing, or by electronic
communication, by a supplier, are deceptive acts:
(1) That such subject of a consumer transaction has sponsorship,
approval, performance, characteristics, accessories, uses, or
benefits it does not have which the supplier knows or should
reasonably know it does not have.
(2) That such subject of a consumer transaction is of a particular
standard, quality, grade, style, or model, if it is not and if the
supplier knows or should reasonably know that it is not.
(3) That such subject of a consumer transaction is new or unused,
if it is not and if the supplier knows or should reasonably know
that it is not.
(4) That such subject of a consumer transaction will be supplied
to the public in greater quantity than the supplier intends or
reasonably expects.
(5) That replacement or repair constituting the subject of a
consumer transaction is needed, if it is not and if the supplier
knows or should reasonably know that it is not.
(6) That a specific price advantage exists as to such subject of a
consumer transaction, if it does not and if the supplier knows or
should reasonably know that it does not.
(7) That the supplier has a sponsorship, approval, or affiliation in
such consumer transaction the supplier does not have, and which
the supplier knows or should reasonably know that the supplier
does not have.
(8) That such consumer transaction involves or does not involve
a warranty, a disclaimer of warranties, or other rights, remedies,
or obligations, if the representation is false and if the supplier
2026 IN 231—LS 6559/DI 116


knows or should reasonably know that the representation is false.
(9) That the consumer will receive a rebate, discount, or other
benefit as an inducement for entering into a sale or lease in return
for giving the supplier the names of prospective consumers or
otherwise helping the supplier to enter into other consumer
transactions, if earning the benefit, rebate, or discount is
contingent upon the occurrence of an event subsequent to the time
the consumer agrees to the purchase or lease.
(10) That the supplier is able to deliver or complete the subject of
the consumer transaction within a stated period of time, when the
supplier knows or should reasonably know the supplier could not.
If no time period has been stated by the supplier, there is a
presumption that the supplier has represented that the supplier
will deliver or complete the subject of the consumer transaction
within a reasonable time, according to the course of dealing or the
usage of the trade.
(11) That the consumer will be able to purchase the subject of the
consumer transaction as advertised by the supplier, if the supplier
does not intend to sell it.
(12) That the replacement or repair constituting the subject of a
consumer transaction can be made by the supplier for the estimate
the supplier gives a customer for the replacement or repair, if the
specified work is completed and:
(A) the cost exceeds the estimate by an amount equal to or
greater than ten percent (10%) of the estimate;
(B) the supplier did not obtain written permission from the
customer to authorize the supplier to complete the work even
if the cost would exceed the amounts specified in clause (A);
(C) the total cost for services and parts for a single transaction
is more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750); and
(D) the supplier knew or reasonably should have known that
the cost would exceed the estimate in the amounts specified in
clause (A).
(13) That the replacement or repair constituting the subject of a
consumer transaction is needed, and that the supplier disposes of
the part repaired or replaced earlier than seventy-two (72) hours
after both:
(A) the customer has been notified that the work has been
completed; and
(B) the part repaired or replaced has been made available for
examination upon the request of the customer.
(14) Engaging in the replacement or repair of the subject of a
2026 IN 231—LS 6559/DI 116


consumer transaction if the consumer has not authorized the
replacement or repair, and if the supplier knows or should
reasonably know that it is not authorized.
(15) The act of misrepresenting the geographic location of the
supplier by listing an alternate business name or an assumed
business name (as described in IC 23-0.5-3-4) in a local telephone
directory if:
(A) the name misrepresents the supplier's geographic location;
(B) the listing fails to identify the locality and state of the
supplier's business;
(C) calls to the local telephone number are routinely forwarded
or otherwise transferred to a supplier's business location that
is outside the calling area covered by the local telephone
directory; and
(D) the supplier's business location is located in a county that
is not contiguous to a county in the calling area covered by the
local telephone directory.
(16) The act of listing an alternate business name or assumed
business name (as described in IC 23-0.5-3-4) in a directory
assistance data base if:
(A) the name misrepresents the supplier's geographic location;
(B) calls to the local telephone number are routinely forwarded
or otherwise transferred to a supplier's business location that
is outside the local calling area; and
(C) the supplier's business location is located in a county that
is not contiguous to a county in the local calling area.
(17) The violation by a supplier of IC 24-3-4 concerning
cigarettes for import or export.
(18) The act of a supplier in knowingly selling or reselling a
product to a consumer if the product has been recalled, whether
by the order of a court or a regulatory body, or voluntarily by the
manufacturer, distributor, or retailer, unless the product has been
repaired or modified to correct the defect that was the subject of
the recall.
(19) The violation by a supplier of 47 U.S.C. 227, including any
rules or regulations issued under 47 U.S.C. 227.
(20) The violation by a supplier of the federal Fair Debt
Collection Practices Act (15 U.S.C. 1692 et seq.), including any
rules or regulations issued under the federal Fair Debt Collection
Practices Act (15 U.S.C. 1692 et seq.).
(21) A violation of IC 24-5-7 (concerning health spa services), as
set forth in IC 24-5-7-17.
2026 IN 231—LS 6559/DI 116


(22) A violation of IC 24-5-8 (concerning business opportunity
transactions), as set forth in IC 24-5-8-20.
(23) A violation of IC 24-5-10 (concerning home consumer
transactions), as set forth in IC 24-5-10-18.
(24) A violation of IC 24-5-11 (concerning real property
improvement contracts), as set forth in IC 24-5-11-14.
(25) A violation of IC 24-5-12 (concerning telephone
solicitations), as set forth in IC 24-5-12-23.
(26) A violation of IC 24-5-13.5 (concerning buyback motor
vehicles), as set forth in IC 24-5-13.5-14.
(27) A violation of IC 24-5-14 (concerning automatic
dialing-announcing devices), as set forth in IC 24-5-14-13.
(28) A violation of IC 24-5-15 (concerning credit services
organizations), as set forth in IC 24-5-15-11.
(29) A violation of IC 24-5-16 (concerning unlawful motor
vehicle subleasing), as set forth in IC 24-5-16-18.
(30) A violation of IC 24-5-17 (concerning environmental
marketing claims), as set forth in IC 24-5-17-14.
(31) A violation of IC 24-5-19 (concerning deceptive commercial
solicitation), as set forth in IC 24-5-19-11.
(32) A violation of IC 24-5-21 (concerning prescription drug
discount cards), as set forth in IC 24-5-21-7.
(33) A violation of IC 24-5-23.5-7 (concerning real estate
appraisals), as set forth in IC 24-5-23.5-9.
(34) A violation of IC 24-5-26 (concerning identity theft), as set
forth in IC 24-5-26-3.
(35) A violation of IC 24-5.5 (concerning mortgage rescue fraud),
as set forth in IC 24-5.5-6-1.
(36) A violation of IC 24-8 (concerning promotional gifts and
contests), as set forth in IC 24-8-6-3.
(37) A violation of IC 21-18.5-6 (concerning representations
made by a postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational
institution), as set forth in IC 21-18.5-6-22.5.
(38) A violation of IC 24-5-15.5 (concerning collection actions of
a plaintiff debt buyer), as set forth in IC 24-5-15.5-6.
(39) A violation of IC 24-14 (concerning towing services), as set
forth in IC 24-14-10-1.
(40) A violation of IC 24-5-14.5 (concerning misleading or
inaccurate caller identification information), as set forth in
IC 24-5-14.5-12.
(41) A violation of IC 24-5-27 (concerning intrastate inmate
calling services), as set forth in IC 24-5-27-27.
2026 IN 231—LS 6559/DI 116


(42) A violation of IC 15-21 (concerning sales of dogs by retail
pet stores), as set forth in IC 15-21-7-4.
(43) A violation of IC 24-4-23 (concerning the security of
information collected and transmitted by an adult oriented website
operator), as set forth in IC 24-4-23-14.
(44) A violation of IC 10-17-16 (concerning the prohibition of
receiving compensation for assisting a person in obtaining
veterans' benefits).
(c) Any representations on or within a product or its packaging or
in advertising or promotional materials which would constitute a
deceptive act shall be the deceptive act both of the supplier who places
such representation thereon or therein, or who authored such materials,
and such other suppliers who shall state orally or in writing that such
representation is true if such other supplier shall know or have reason
to know that such representation was false.
(d) If a supplier shows by a preponderance of the evidence that an
act resulted from a bona fide error notwithstanding the maintenance of
procedures reasonably adopted to avoid the error, such act shall not be
deceptive within the meaning of this chapter.
(e) It shall be a defense to any action brought under this chapter that
the representation constituting an alleged deceptive act was one made
in good faith by the supplier without knowledge of its falsity and in
reliance upon the oral or written representations of the manufacturer,
the person from whom the supplier acquired the product, any testing
organization, or any other person provided that the source thereof is
disclosed to the consumer.
(f) For purposes of subsection (b)(12), a supplier that provides
estimates before performing repair or replacement work for a customer
shall give the customer a written estimate itemizing as closely as
possible the price for labor and parts necessary for the specific job
before commencing the work.
(g) For purposes of subsection (b)(15) and (b)(16), a telephone
company or other provider of a telephone directory or directory
assistance service or its officer or agent is immune from liability for
publishing the listing of an alternate business name or assumed
business name of a supplier in its directory or directory assistance data
base unless the telephone company or other provider of a telephone
directory or directory assistance service is the same person as the
supplier who has committed the deceptive act.
(h) For purposes of subsection (b)(18), it is an affirmative defense
to any action brought under this chapter that the product has been
altered by a person other than the defendant to render the product
2026 IN 231—LS 6559/DI 116


completely incapable of serving its original purpose.
2026 IN 231—LS 6559/DI 116